Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.860

[Art. 140] Execution of process and sentence.

In the organized militia not in federal service, the processes and sentences of its courts-martial shall be executed by the civil officers prescribed by the laws of the state.

[ 1989 c 48 s 77; 1963 c 220 s 125.]